Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1149
Office of Oral Health and Dentistry; Dental Health Director; appointment.

There is hereby established the Office of Oral Health and Dentistry in the department. The head of such office shall be known as the Dental Health Director and shall be appointed by the department. The Dental Health Director shall give full time to his or her duties.

Laws 1949, c. 201, § 1, p. 584;

Laws 1953, c. 239, § 1, p. 828;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 411;

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 82;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-193.01;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 326;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 482.